District of Columbia statutes.
16-1352

Condemnation proceedings by Attorney General.

When, for the purposes specified by section 16-1351 , it is deemed necessary or advantageous to do so, the acquiring authority may acquire real property in the District of Columbia in the name of the United States by condemnation under judicial process. The Attorney General of the United States, upon the request of the acquiring authority, shall institute a proceeding for the condemnation of the property in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 577, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Cross References

Streets and alleys, condemnation, § 9-203.02 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1352.
1973 Ed., § 16-1352.